Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.525

Immunization assessment and enhancement proposals by local jurisdictions.

(1) The department, in conjunction with local health jurisdictions, shall require each local health jurisdiction to submit an immunization assessment and enhancement proposal, consistent with the standards established in the public health [services] improvement plan, to provide immunization protection to the children of the state to further reduce vaccine-preventable diseases.

(2) These plans shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) A description of the population groups in the jurisdiction that are in the greatest need of immunizations;

(b) A description of strategies to use outreach, volunteer, and other local educational resources to enhance immunization rates; and

(c) A description of the capacity required to accomplish the enhancement proposal.

(3) This section shall be implemented consistent with available funding.

(4) The secretary shall report through the public health [services] improvement plan to the health care and fiscal committees of the legislature on the status of the program and progress made toward increasing immunization rates in population groups of greatest need.

[ 1994 c 299 s 29.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—1994 c 299: See notes following RCW 74.12.400.

Immunization: RCW 28A.210.060.